Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 7 Milk and Milk Products
26-2-249.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful:

To handle milk, cream, butter, ice cream, or other dairy products in unclean or unsanitary places or in an unsanitary manner;

To keep, store, or prepare for market any milk, cream, or other dairy products in the same building or enclosure where any hide or fur or any cow, horse, nontraditional livestock, hog, or other livestock is kept;

To handle or ship milk, cream, ice cream, or other dairy products in unclean or unsanitary vessels;

To expose milk, cream, ice cream, or other dairy products to flies or to any contaminating influence likely to convey pathogenic or other injurious bacteria;

For any common carrier, railway, or express company to neglect or fail to remove or ship from its depot, on the day of its arrival there for shipment, any milk, cream, or other dairy products left at the depot for transportation;

For any common carrier, railway, or express company to allow merchandise of a contaminating nature to be stored on or with dairy products;

To use or possess any branded or registered cream can or milk can or ice cream container for any purpose other than the handling, storing, or shipping of milk, cream, or ice cream; provided, however, that no person other than the rightful owner thereof shall use or possess any can, bottle, or other receptacle if such receptacle shall be marked with the brand or trademark of the owner. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the temporary possession by a business involved in the normal processing, distribution, or retail sale of dairy products of any can, bottle, or other receptacle which is marked with the brand or trademark of another person or entity prior to its return to the rightful owner in the normal course of business, or if purchased from the rightful owner;

To sell or offer for sale ice cream from a container or a compartment of a cabinet or fountain which contains any article of food other than ice cream or dairy products;

To sell or offer for sale milk, cream, butter, cheese, ice cream, or other dairy products that are not pure and fresh and handled with clean utensils;

To sell or offer for sale milk or cream from diseased or unhealthy animals or which was handled by any person suffering from or coming in contact with persons affected with any contagious disease;

To sell or offer for sale any milk or cream which shall have been exposed to contamination or into which shall have fallen any unsanitary articles or any foreign substance which would render the milk or cream or the product manufactured therefrom unfit for human consumption; or

To sell or offer for sale milk, cream, butter, cheese, ice cream, or other dairy products which do not comply with the standards and requirements of this article or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 7; Code 1933, § 42-508; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 16; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 29; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 18; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1298, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 25/SB 364; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 26/HB 90.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-249 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “or” at the end of paragraph (11).

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 amendment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 192 (2000).

26-2-249.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful:

To handle milk, cream, butter, ice cream, or other dairy products in unclean or unsanitary places or in an unsanitary manner;

To keep, store, or prepare for market any milk, cream, or other dairy products in the same building or enclosure where any hide or fur or any cow, horse, nontraditional livestock, hog, or other livestock is kept;

To handle or ship milk, cream, ice cream, or other dairy products in unclean or unsanitary vessels;

To expose milk, cream, ice cream, or other dairy products to flies or to any contaminating influence likely to convey pathogenic or other injurious bacteria;

For any common carrier, railway, or express company to neglect or fail to remove or ship from its depot, on the day of its arrival there for shipment, any milk, cream, or other dairy products left at the depot for transportation;

For any common carrier, railway, or express company to allow merchandise of a contaminating nature to be stored on or with dairy products;

To use or possess any branded or registered cream can or milk can or ice cream container for any purpose other than the handling, storing, or shipping of milk, cream, or ice cream; provided, however, that no person other than the rightful owner thereof shall use or possess any can, bottle, or other receptacle if such receptacle shall be marked with the brand or trademark of the owner. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the temporary possession by a business involved in the normal processing, distribution, or retail sale of dairy products of any can, bottle, or other receptacle which is marked with the brand or trademark of another person or entity prior to its return to the rightful owner in the normal course of business, or if purchased from the rightful owner;

To sell or offer for sale ice cream from a container or a compartment of a cabinet or fountain which contains any article of food other than ice cream or dairy products;

To sell or offer for sale milk, cream, butter, cheese, ice cream, or other dairy products that are not pure and fresh and handled with clean utensils;

To sell or offer for sale milk or cream from diseased or unhealthy animals or which was handled by any person suffering from or coming in contact with persons affected with any contagious disease;

To sell or offer for sale any milk or cream which shall have been exposed to contamination or into which shall have fallen any unsanitary articles or any foreign substance which would render the milk or cream or the product manufactured therefrom unfit for human consumption; or

To sell or offer for sale milk, cream, butter, cheese, ice cream, or other dairy products which do not comply with the standards and requirements of this article or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder except raw milk for human consumption which complies with the standards and requirements of Article 18 of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 280, § 7; Code 1933, § 42-508; Ga. L. 1935, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 16; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 29; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1219, § 18; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1298, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 25/SB 364; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 26/HB 90; Ga. L. 2022, p. 809, § 6/HB 1175.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-2-249 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, added “except raw milk for human consumption which complies with the standards and requirements of Article 18 of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder” at the end of paragraph (12).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 809, § 1/HB 1175, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Raw Dairy Act.’”

26-2-250.
Penalties for violations of article.

Any person who violates this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, Ex. Sess., p. 61, § 4; Code 1933, § 42-9914; Ga. L. 1961, p. 501, § 22; Ga. L. 1980, p. 981, § 19.